Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.060

Fees.

The council shall impose fees on any degree-granting institution authorized to operate under this chapter. Fees shall be set and revised by the council by rule at the level necessary to approximately recover the staffing costs incurred in administering this chapter. Fees shall be deposited in the general fund.

[ 2012 c 229 s 547; 1986 c 136 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.